Mississippi, session 2026, SB2524.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Section 37-163-1, which creates the Education Achievement Council, is hereby repealed. SECTION 2. (1)  The Legislature finds that: (a)  Advanced skills training at any age that leads to an individual's postsecondary attainment is vital for Mississippi's economic growth and directly contributes to a higher quality of life for its citizens. (b) "Postsecondary attainment" means a workforce certification, an industry credential, or an academic degree leading to an occupation in the public or private sector.  A credential of value is affiliated with a private sector priority occupation, as designated by the state's Office of Workforce Development, leading to a high-growth, high-wage occupation. (c)  An effective strategy for increasing postsecondary attainment requires close collaboration between educational entities, companies doing business in Mississippi, workforce programs and economic development systems to ensure long-term prosperity. (d)  Mississippi's public and private two- and four-year colleges and institutions are a valued partner in the state's economic and workforce development activities, serving as the primary suppliers of a trained workforce required to meet the demand of expanding or newly established private and public sector employment opportunities. (e)  The State's Longitudinal Data System collects valuable information that can help align regional and state-level postsecondary attainment with current and future workforce needs across the state.  Third parties, including citizens, should be able to easily access data so they can identify high-growth, high-wage and high-demand private sector priority occupations and public sector jobs at each postsecondary educational attainment level. (2)  There is created the Mississippi Postsecondary Attainment Council ("M-PAC") whose purpose is establishing the state's postsecondary attainment goals, as well as action-oriented strategies designed to make progress toward that goal.  The work of M-PAC shall be done in a collaborative manner with the inclusion of Mississippi's public and private education, workforce and economic development leaders to identify and promote solutions to achieve the state's educational attainment goals.  The council shall not displace any existing, codified governing or coordinating bodies or their responsibilities. (3)  M-PAC shall have a total membership of twenty-five (25) voting members or their designees, representing academic, private and state sectors, as follows: (a)  Academic Sector Representatives: (i)  The Commissioner of the State Institutions of Higher Learning; (ii)  The Executive Director of the Mississippi Community College Board; (iii)  The Executive Director of the Mississippi Alliance of Independent Colleges and Universities; (iv)  The President of the Mississippi Association for Proprietary Schools; (v)  The State Superintendent of the Mississippi Department of Education; (vi)  One (1) President of a community or junior college to be appointed by the Governor; (vii)  One (1) President or Chancellor of a public institution of higher learning to be appointed by the Lieutenant Governor; (viii)  One (1) President of a private college or university to be appointed by the Speaker of the House; and (ix)  One (1) Superintendent of a local K-12 school district to be appointed by the Superintendent of the Department of Education. (b)  Private Sector Representatives: (i)  One (1) representative of the Mississippi Business Alliance Foundation's WorkFuture Institute for Workforce and Educational Excellence; (ii)  The President of the Mississippi Economic Development Council; and (iii)  Five (5) representatives of priority occupation businesses to be appointed by the Executive Director of the Office of Workforce Development. (c)  State Government Representatives: (i)  One (1) representative of the Office of the Governor, to be appointed by the Governor; (ii)  The Chairman of the State Workforce Investment Board; (iii)  The Executive Director of the Office of Workforce Development; (iv)  The Chairmen of the Universities and Colleges Committees of the Mississippi State Senate and House of Representatives; (v)  The Chairmen of the Education Committees of the Mississippi State Senate and House of Representatives; (vi)  The Chairman of the Economic and Workforce Development Committee of the Mississippi Senate; and (vii)  The Chairman of the Workforce Development Committee of the Mississippi House of Representatives. (d)  A representative from the State Longitudinal System shall serve in an ex-officio, nonvoting capacity. (4)  (a)  The council shall elect a chairman and a vice chairman from among its membership.  An election for chairman shall be held annually, and no chairman shall serve more than two (2) consecutive terms. (b)  The council may name five (5) to seven (7) of its members to constitute an executive committee, which shall act for the council pursuant to its direction. (c)  A system of committees comprised of council members and non-members, as needed, may be organized for the purposes of performing the council's work. (5)  The State Longitudinal Data System (SLDS) shall provide data to M-PAC for the purpose of producing the following reports: (a)  Annual Report. M-PAC shall work in coordination with the Office of Workforce Development to report Mississippi's progress in raising the postsecondary attainment rate, defined as the percentage of adults with a college degree, credential or recognized certification.  Beginning in 2027, such annual report shall be published publicly on or before November 1 each year and presented to the State Workforce Investment Board, the Lieutenant Governor, the Speaker of the House and the Governor. (b)  Progress Reports.  M-PAC shall publish and maintain a publicly accessible dashboard-style scorecard quantifying progress toward the state's attainment goal. (6)  The Office of Workforce Development shall serve as the principal staff to support the Mississippi Postsecondary Attainment Council.  The Board of Trustees of State Institutions of Higher Learning, the Mississippi Community College Board, the Mississippi Alliance of Independent Colleges and Universities and the State Longitudinal Data System shall provide appropriate staff to support the work of the Mississippi Postsecondary Attainment Council. (7)  The Legislature may appropriate funds for the administrative, contractual costs, travel and other expenses of the council. (8)  Legislative members of the council shall be entitled to per diem and reimbursement of expenses in accordance with Section 25-3-41, Mississippi Code of 1972.  Non-legislative members shall serve without compensation but may be reimbursed for necessary travel expenses from any available funds designated for such purposes. SECTION 3.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.